Illinois, session 104th, SB4098.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. In addition to any other sums appropriated, the 6sum of $390,657,500, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is 7appropriated from the Title III Social Security and Employment 8Fund to the Department of Employment Security for operational 9expenses, awards, grants, and permanent improvements for the 10fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, including prior years' 11costs. 12    Section 10. The following named sums, or so much thereof 13as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Department of 14Employment Security:15WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT16Payable from Title III Social Security and 17 Employment Fund:18  For the expenses related to Employment19   Security Automation.............................23,900,00020    Total                                         $23,900,00021Payable from the Unemployment Compensation 22 Special Administration Fund:  SB4098- 2 -OMB104 00183 LNW 10183 b1  For expenses related to Legal2   Assistance as required by law....................2,000,0003  For Interest on Refunds of Erroneously4   Paid Contributions, Penalties and5   Interest...........................................100,0006    Total                                          $2,100,000 7    Section 15. The following named amounts, or so much 8thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 9the Department of Employment Security:10WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT11Grants-In-Aid12Payable from Title III Social Security 13 and Employment Fund:14  For Tort Claims.....................................675,000 15    Section 20. The following named amounts, or so much 16thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 17Department of Employment Security for unemployment 18compensation benefits to former state employees as follows:19TRUST FUND UNIT20Grants-In-Aid21Payable from the Road Fund:22  For benefits paid on the basis of wages23   paid for insured work for the Department24   of Transportation................................6,500,000  SB4098- 3 -OMB104 00183 LNW 10183 b1Payable from Title III Social Security 2 and Employment Fund................................1,734,3003Payable from the General Revenue Fund..............20,000,0004    Total                                         $28,234,300 5    Section 35. The amount of $700,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Department of Employment Security for data 8analysis and administrative expenses associated with the 9Homelessness Prevention administrative data pilot addressing 10homelessness prevention strategies. 11    Section 40. The amount of $155,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 13Fund to the Department of Employment Security to implement 14diversity, equity, inclusion, and accessibility initiatives. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 162026.